Maryland, session 2025, HB0245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
7–218.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGRICULTURAL LAND” MEANS REAL PROPERTY THAT IS OR WAS
ASSESSED ON THE BASIS OF FARM OR AGRICULTURAL USE UNDER § 8–209 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0245*

HOUSE BILL 245
(3) “BENEFICIARY OF LIMITED MEANS” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
ENTITLED TO PROPERTY OF A DECEDENT IF THE INDIVIDUAL’S FEDERAL ADJUSTED
GROSS INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED:
(I) $125,000 FOR AN INDIVIDUAL OTHER THAN AN INDIVIDUAL
DESCRIBED IN ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; OR
(II) $250,000 FOR SPOUSES FILING A JOINT RETURN OR FOR A
SURVIVING SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE.
(4) “ELIGIBLE REAL PROPERTY” MEANS REAL PROPERTY THAT:
(I) PASSES FROM THE DECEDENT TO A BENEFICIARY OF
LIMITED MEANS; AND
(II) 1. IS THE PRIMARY RESIDENCE OF THE BENEFICIARY OF
LIMITED MEANS; OR
2. IS AGRICULTURAL LAND THAT THE BENEFICIARY OF
LIMITED MEANS MAINTAINS AS AGRICULTURAL LAND.
(5) “FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 10–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) ON APPLICATION OF A BENEFICIARY OF LIMITED MEANS, THE REGISTER
WHO DETERMINES THE INHERITANCE TAX UNDER § 7–214 OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL
ALLOW AN INSTALLMENT PAYMENT PLAN FOR THE INHERITANCE TAX TO BE PAID BY
THE BENEFICIARY OF LIMITED MEANS ON ELIGIBLE REAL PROPERTY IF PAYMENT
OF THE INHERITANCE TAX ON THE DUE DATE WOULD REQUIRE THE SALE OF THE
ELIGIBLE REAL PROPERTY.
(C) A BENEFICIARY OF LIMITED MEANS MAY APPLY FOR THE INSTALLMENT
PAYMENT PLAN BY FILING WITH THE REGISTER AN APPLICATION ON THE FORM AND
IN THE MANNER THAT THE REGISTER REQUIRES.
(D) THE REGISTER SHALL SPECIFY THE INSTALLMENT PAYMENT SCHEDULE
AND THE AMOUNT OF ANY INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all decedents dying on or after July 1, 2025.